Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1168
Records required;
available for inspection.

Every market license
holder under the Livestock Auction Market Act shall keep an accurate record
of all transactions conducted in the ordinary course of his or her business.
Such records shall be available for examination of the director, or his or her duly authorized representative, in
respect to a market license issued under such act.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 12, p. 966;

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 68;

Laws 2001, LB 197, § 12;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 6.